Maine, session 132, LD2194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2025, c. 511, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Indigent legal services. "Indigent legal services" means:
A. Legal representation provided to an indigent defendant in a criminal case in which
the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine or federal or state law
requires that the State provide representation;
B. Legal representation provided to an indigent party in a civil case in which the United
States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine or federal or state law, except any
provision of Title 18-C, requires that the State provide representation;
C. Legal representation provided by an attorney appointed by a court to represent a
juvenile defendants defendant or a juvenile who petitions for emancipation pursuant to
Title 15, section 3506-A;
C-1. Legal representation provided by an attorney appointed by a court:
(1) Pursuant to Title 25, section 2244, subsection 2, paragraph B to represent an
indigent party who is a respondent in an extreme risk protection order proceeding;
(2) Pursuant to Title 34-B, section 3862-A, subsection 6, paragraph A to represent
an indigent party who is a restricted person in an extreme risk protection order
proceeding; and
(3) Pursuant to Title 34-B, section 3864, subsection 5, paragraph D to represent a
person who is the subject of an involuntary commitment proceeding or involuntary
treatment proceeding.
D. Legal representation provided to an indigent defendant or party or, a juvenile or a
nonparty witness for the purpose of filing, on behalf of that indigent defendant or party
or, juvenile or nonparty witness, a petition for certiorari to the Supreme Court of the
United States from an adverse decision of the Law Court on a case for which services
were previously provided to that defendant or party or, juvenile or nonparty witness
pursuant to paragraph A, B or, C, C-1 or E; and
E. Services performed by an attorney at the direction of the commission that aid the
commission in fulfilling the commission's purpose under section 1801, including legal
representation provided to a nonparty witness in a criminal proceeding or a civil
proceeding when the United States Constitution requires that the State provide
representation to that nonparty witness.
"Indigent legal services" includes the services of an attorney appointed pursuant to Title
22, section 4005, subsection 1, paragraph F but does not include the services of a guardian
ad litem appointed pursuant to any provision of Title 18-C or pursuant to Title 19-A, section
1658, subsection 2-A or Title 22, section 4005, subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4005, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 1995, c. 405, §20, is
further amended to read:
F. The guardian ad litem or the child may request the court to appoint legal counsel
for the child. The District Court shall pay reasonable costs and expenses of the child's
Page 1 - 132LR3015(01)

412 legal counsel. If legal counsel is appointed for the child under this paragraph, the child
423 must be considered indigent and the appointment must be at public expense.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4036, sub-§1-A, ¶F, as amended by PL 2013, c. 294, §1, is
further amended to read:
F. When a provisional order awarding parental rights and responsibilities is entered
under paragraph D‑1, subparagraph (2), the court may terminate the appointments of
the guardian ad litem and attorneys for parents and guardians. When the child
protection action is dismissed under paragraph D‑1, subparagraph (1) or (2), the court
shall terminate the appointments of the guardian ad litem and attorneys for parents and
guardians. After the appointments are terminated, the attorneys and guardian ad litem
have no further responsibilities to their clients or the court. The Maine Commission
on Public Defense Services shall, in accordance with rules and procedures adopted by
the commission under Title 4, chapter 37, compensate attorneys appointed or assigned
to provide indigent legal services to the parent or guardian in the child protection action
for legal representation provided under this subsection.